Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 63. Fairs and Exhibits

§ 2301.
Appropriations.

A municipality may appropriate not to exceed two and one-half percent of its grand list to aid an agricultural fair or other public exhibition intended to promote the interests of any branch of agriculture, mechanic arts, or any of the liberal arts.
No such appropriation shall be used so to enable any incorporated fair association to pay dividends on its capital stock.